Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Article 2.3. Stormwater Management Act.
§ 62.1-44.15:25.
(For expiration date — see notes) Further powers and duties of the State Water Control Board.

In addition to other powers and duties conferred upon the Board, it shall permit, regulate, and control stormwater runoff in the Commonwealth. The Board may issue, deny, revoke, terminate, or amend state stormwater individual permits or coverage issued under state general permits; adopt regulations; approve and periodically review Virginia Stormwater Management Programs and management programs developed in conjunction with a state municipal separate storm sewer permit; enforce the provisions of this article; and otherwise act to ensure the general health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of the Commonwealth as well as protect the quality and quantity of state waters from the potential harm of unmanaged stormwater. The Board may:

Issue, deny, amend, revoke, terminate, and enforce state permits for the control of stormwater discharges from Municipal Separate Storm Sewer Systems and land-disturbing activities.

Take administrative and legal actions to ensure compliance with the provisions of this article by any person subject to state or VSMP authority permit requirements under this article, and those entities with an approved Virginia Stormwater Management Program and management programs developed in conjunction with a state municipal separate storm sewer system permit, including the proper enforcement and implementation of, and continual compliance with, this article.

In accordance with procedures of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.), amend or revoke any state permit issued under this article on the following grounds or for good cause as may be provided by the regulations of the Board:

Any person subject to state permit requirements under this article has violated or failed, neglected, or refused to obey any order or regulation of the Board, any order, notice, or requirement of the Department, any condition of a state permit, any provision of this article, or any order of a court, where such violation results in the unreasonable degradation of properties, water quality, stream channels, and other natural resources, or the violation is representative of a pattern of serious or repeated violations, including the disregard for or inability to comply with applicable laws, regulations, permit conditions, orders, rules, or requirements;

Any person subject to state permit requirements under this article has failed to disclose fully all relevant material facts or has misrepresented a material fact in applying for a state permit, or in any other report or document required under this law or under the regulations of the Board;

The activity for which the state permit was issued causes unreasonable degradation of properties, water quality, stream channels, and other natural resources; or

There exists a material change in the basis on which the state permit was issued that requires either a temporary or a permanent reduction or elimination of any discharge or land-disturbing activity controlled by the state permit necessary to prevent unreasonable degradation of properties, water quality, stream channels, and other natural resources.

Cause investigations and inspections to ensure compliance with any state or VSMP authority permits, conditions, policies, rules, regulations, rulings, and orders which it may adopt, issue, or establish and to furnish advice, recommendations, or instructions for the purpose of obtaining such compliance.

In accordance with procedures of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.), adopt rules governing (i) hearings, (ii) the filing of reports, (iii) the issuance of permits and special orders, and (iv) all other matters relating to procedure, and amend or cancel any rule adopted.

Issue special orders to any person subject to state or VSMP authority permit requirements under this article (i) who is permitting or causing the unreasonable degradation of properties, water quality, stream channels, and other natural resources to cease and desist from such activities; (ii) who has failed to construct facilities in accordance with final approved plans and specifications to construct such facilities; (iii) who has violated the terms and provisions of a state or VSMP authority permit issued by the Board or VSMP authority to comply with the provisions of the state or VSMP authority permit, this article, and any decision of the VSMP authority, the Department, or the Board; or (iv) who has violated the terms of an order issued by the court, the VSMP authority, the Department, or the Board to comply with the terms of such order, and also to issue orders to require any person subject to state or VSMP authority permit requirements under this article to comply with the provisions of this article and any decision of the Board.

Such special orders are to be issued in accordance with the procedures of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) and shall become effective not less than 15 days after the date of mailing with confirmation of delivery of the notice to the last known address of any person subject to state or VSMP authority permit requirements under this article, provided that if the Board finds that any such person subject to state or VSMP authority permit requirements under this article is grossly affecting or presents an imminent and substantial danger to (i) the public health, safety, or welfare or the health of animals, fish, or aquatic life; (ii) a public water supply; or (iii) recreational, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other reasonable uses, it may issue, without advance notice or hearing, an emergency special order directing any person subject to state or VSMP authority permit requirements under this article to cease such pollution or discharge immediately, and shall provide an opportunity for a hearing, after reasonable notice as to the time and place thereof to any person subject to state or VSMP authority permit requirements under this article, to affirm, modify, amend, or cancel such emergency special order. If any person subject to state or VSMP authority permit requirements under this article who has been issued such a special order or an emergency special order is not complying with the terms thereof, the Board may proceed in accordance with §

62.1-44.15:48

, and where the order is based on a finding of an imminent and substantial danger, the court shall issue an injunction compelling compliance with the emergency special order pending a hearing by the Board. If an emergency special order requires cessation of a discharge, the recipient of the order may appeal its issuance to the circuit court of the jurisdiction wherein the discharge was alleged to have occurred.

The provisions of this section notwithstanding, the Board may proceed directly under §

62.1-44.15:48

for any past violation or violations of any provision of this article or any regulation duly adopted hereunder.

With the consent of any person subject to state or VSMP authority permit requirements under this article who has violated or failed, neglected, or refused to obey any regulation or order of the Board, any order, notice, or requirement of the Department or VSMP authority, any condition of a state or VSMP authority permit, or any provision of this article, the Board may provide, in an order issued by the Board against such person, for the payment of civil charges for violations in specific sums not to exceed the limit specified in subsection A of §

62.1-44.15:48

. Such civil charges shall be collected in lieu of any appropriate civil penalty that could be imposed pursuant to subsection A of §

62.1-44.15:48

and shall not be subject to the provisions of §

2.2-514

. Such civil charges shall be paid into the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Virginia Stormwater Management Fund established pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:29

.

History.

2004, c. 372, § 10.1-603.2:1; 2006, c. 171; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect at that time, see the following section, also numbered

62.1-44.15:25

.

The section above is effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect until that time, see the preceding section, also numbered

62.1-44.15:25

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 5 provides: “That the transfer of the responsibility for administering the issuance and enforcement of national pollutant discharge elimination system permits for the control of stormwater discharges shall become effective on July 1, 2013, or upon the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s rescission of authorization for delegation of program authority to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, whichever occurs later.” Pursuant to a letter received from the Environmental Protection Agency on July 2, 2013, the transfer of responsibility from DCR to DEQ has been approved as required by this provision.

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 ( §

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act ( §

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts
2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 68 and 758 are identical, and rewrote the section. For effective date, see Editor’s note.

§ 62.1-44.15:25.
(For effective date — see notes) Further powers and duties of the State Water Control Board.

In addition to other powers and duties conferred upon the Board by this chapter, it shall permit, regulate, and control soil erosion and stormwater runoff in the Commonwealth and may otherwise act to protect the quality and quantity of state waters from the potential harm of unmanaged stormwater and soil erosion. It shall be the duty of the Board and it shall have the authority to:

Issue special orders pursuant to subdivision (8a) or (8b) of §

62.1-44.15

to any owner subject to requirements under this article, except that for any land-disturbing activity that disturbs an area measuring not less than 10,000 square feet but less than one acre in an area of a locality that is not designated as a Chesapeake Bay Preservation Area pursuant to the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq.) and that is not part of a larger common plan of development or sale that disturbs one acre or more of land, such special orders may include civil penalties of up to $5,000 per violation, not to exceed $50,000 per order. Such civil penalties shall be paid into the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Stormwater Local Assistance Fund established pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:29.1

.The provisions of this section notwithstanding, the Board may proceed directly under §

62.1-44.15:48

or Article 5 (§

62.1-44.20

et seq.) for any past violation or violations of any provision of this article or any regulation duly adopted hereunder.

With the consent of any owner subject to requirements under this article, the Board may provide, in an order issued by the Board pursuant to subdivision (8d) of §

62.1-44.15

against such owner, for the payment of civil charges for violations in specific sums. Such sums shall not exceed the limit specified in subdivision A 1 or B 1, as applicable, of §

62.1-44.15:48

. Such civil charges shall be collected in lieu of any appropriate civil penalty that could be imposed pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:48

and shall not be subject to the provisions of §

2.2-514

. Such civil charges shall be paid into the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Stormwater Local Assistance Fund established pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:29.1

.

History.

2004, c. 372, § 10.1-603.2:1; 2006, c. 171; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2016, cc. 68, 758.

§ 62.1-44.15:25.1.
(For effective date — see notes) Additional local authority.

Any locality serving as a VESMP authority shall have the authority to:

Issue orders in accordance with the procedures of subdivision 10 a of §

15.2-2122

to any owner subject to the requirements of this article. Such orders may include civil penalties in specific sums not to exceed the limit specified in subdivision A 2 or B 2, as applicable, of §

62.1-44.15:48

, and such civil penalties shall be paid into the treasury of the locality in accordance with subdivision A 2 of §

62.1-44.15:48

. The provisions of this section notwithstanding, the locality may proceed directly under §

62.1-44.15:48

for any past violation or violations of any provision of this article or any ordinance duly adopted hereunder.

Issue consent orders with the consent of any person who has violated or failed, neglected, or refused to obey any ordinance adopted pursuant to the provisions of this article, any condition of a locality’s land-disturbance approval, or any order of a locality serving as a VESMP authority. Such consent order may provide for the payment of civil charges not to exceed the limits specified in subdivision A 2 or B 2, as applicable, of §

62.1-44.15:48

. Such civil charges shall be in lieu of any appropriate civil penalty that could be imposed under this article. Any civil charges collected shall be paid to the treasury of the locality in accordance with subdivision A 2 of §

62.1-44.15:48

.

History.

2016, cc. 68, 758.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

§ 62.1-44.15:26.
(For repeal date — see notes) State permits.

All state permits issued by the Board under this article shall have fixed terms. The term of a state permit shall be based upon the projected duration of the project, the length of any required monitoring, or other project operations or permit conditions; however, the term shall not exceed five years. The term of a permit issued by the Board shall not be extended by modification beyond the maximum duration and the permit shall expire at the end of the term unless it is administratively continued in accordance with Board regulations.

State individual construction permits shall be administered by the Department.

History.

2004, c. 372, § 10.1-603.2:2; 2006, c. 171; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793.

Contingent repeal date.

This section is repealed by Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption of regulations required by Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 5 provides: “That the transfer of the responsibility for administering the issuance and enforcement of national pollutant discharge elimination system permits for the control of stormwater discharges shall become effective on July 1, 2013, or upon the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s rescission of authorization for delegation of program authority to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, whichever occurs later.” Pursuant to a letter received from the Environmental Protection Agency on July 2, 2013, the transfer of responsibility from DCR to DEQ has been approved as required by this provision.

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

§ 62.1-44.15:26.1.
Termination of Construction General Permit coverage.

A VSMP authority shall recommend that the Department of Environmental Quality terminate coverage under a General Permit for Discharges of Stormwater from Construction Activities (Construction General Permit) within 60 days of receiving a complete notice of termination from the operator of the construction activity.

Coverage under a Construction General Permit shall be deemed to be terminated 90 days after the receipt by the VSMP authority of a complete notice of termination from the operator of the construction activity.

If a VSMP authority receives a notice of termination of a Construction General Permit that it determines to be incomplete, the VSMP authority shall, within a reasonable time, inform the operator of the construction activity of such incompleteness and provide the operator with a detailed list itemizing the elements of information that are missing from the notice.

History.

2018, c. 630.

§ 62.1-44.15:27.
(For expiration date, see Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 345) Establishment of Virginia Stormwater Management Programs.

Any locality that operates a regulated MS4 or that notifies the Department of its decision to participate in the establishment of a VSMP shall be required to adopt a VSMP for land-disturbing activities consistent with the provisions of this article according to a schedule set by the Department. Such schedule shall require implementation no later than July 1, 2014. Thereafter, the Department shall provide an annual schedule by which localities can submit applications to implement a VSMP. Localities subject to this subsection are authorized to coordinate plan review and inspections with other entities in accordance with subsection H.

The Department shall operate a VSMP on behalf of any locality that does not operate a regulated MS4 and that does not notify the Department, according to a schedule set by the Department, of its decision to participate in the establishment of a VSMP. A locality that decides not to establish a VSMP shall still comply with the requirements set forth in this article and attendant regulations as required to satisfy the stormwater flow rate capacity and velocity requirements set forth in the Erosion and Sediment Control Law (§

62.1-44.15:51

et seq.). A locality that is subject to the provisions of the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq.) also shall adopt requirements set forth in this article and attendant regulations as required to regulate Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act land-disturbing activities in accordance with §

62.1-44.15:28

. To comply with the water quantity technical criteria set forth in this article and attendant regulations, a rural Tidewater locality may adopt a tiered approach to water quantity management for Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act land-disturbing activities pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:27.2

.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, any county that operates an MS4 that became a regulated MS4 on or after January 1, 2014 may elect, on a schedule set by the Department, to defer the implementation of the county’s VSMP until no later than January 1, 2015. During this deferral period, when such county thus lacks the legal authority to operate a VSMP, the Department shall operate a VSMP on behalf of the county and address post-construction stormwater runoff and the required design criteria for stormwater runoff controls. Any such county electing to defer the establishment of its VSMP shall still comply with the requirements set forth in this article and attendant regulations as required to satisfy the stormwater flow rate capacity and velocity requirements set forth in the Erosion and Sediment Control Law (§

62.1-44.15:51

et seq.).

Any town, including a town that operates a regulated MS4, lying within a county that has adopted a VSMP in accordance with subsection A may decide, but shall not be required, to become subject to the county’s VSMP. Any town lying within a county that operates an MS4 that became a regulated MS4 on or after January 1, 2014 may elect to become subject to the county’s VSMP according to the deferred schedule established in subsection A. During the county’s deferral period, the Department shall operate a VSMP on behalf of the town and address post-construction stormwater runoff and the required design criteria for stormwater runoff controls for the town as provided in subsection A. If a town lies within the boundaries of more than one county, the town shall be considered to be wholly within the county in which the larger portion of the town lies. Towns shall inform the Department of their decision according to a schedule established by the Department. Thereafter, the Department shall provide an annual schedule by which towns can submit applications to adopt a VSMP.

In support of VSMP authorities, the Department shall:

Provide assistance grants to localities not currently operating a local stormwater management program to help the localities to establish their VSMP.

Provide technical assistance and training.

Provide qualified services in specified geographic areas to a VSMP to assist localities in the administration of components of their programs. The Department shall actively assist localities in the establishment of their programs and in the selection of a contractor or other entity that may provide support to the locality or regional support to several localities.

The Department shall develop a model ordinance for establishing a VSMP consistent with this article and its associated regulations, including the Virginia Stormwater Management Program (VSMP) General Permit for Discharges of Stormwater from Construction Activities.

Each locality that administers an approved VSMP shall, by ordinance, establish a VSMP that shall be administered in conjunction with a local MS4 program and a local erosion and sediment control program if required pursuant to the Erosion and Sediment Control Law (§

62.1-44.15:51

et seq.), and which shall include the following:

Consistency with regulations adopted in accordance with provisions of this article;

Provisions for long-term responsibility for and maintenance of stormwater management control devices and other techniques specified to manage the quality and quantity of runoff; and

Provisions for the integration of the VSMP with local erosion and sediment control, flood insurance, flood plain management, and other programs requiring compliance prior to authorizing construction in order to make the submission and approval of plans, issuance of permits, payment of fees, and coordination of inspection and enforcement activities more convenient and efficient both for the local governments and those responsible for compliance with the programs.

The Board may approve a state entity, including the Department, federal entity, or, for linear projects subject to annual standards and specifications, electric, natural gas, and telephone utility companies, interstate and intrastate natural gas pipeline companies, railroad companies, or authorities created pursuant to §

15.2-5102

to operate a Virginia Stormwater Management Program consistent with the requirements of this article and its associated regulations and the VSMP authority’s Department-approved annual standards and specifications. For these programs, enforcement shall be administered by the Department and the Board where applicable in accordance with the provisions of this article.

The Board shall approve a VSMP when it deems a program consistent with this article and associated regulations, including the Virginia Stormwater Management Program (VSMP) General Permit for Discharges of Stormwater from Construction Activities.

A VSMP authority may enter into agreements or contracts with soil and water conservation districts, adjacent localities, or other public or private entities to carry out or assist with the responsibilities of this article. A VSMP authority may enter into contracts with third-party professionals who hold certificates of competence in the appropriate subject areas, as provided in subsection A of §

62.1-44.15:30

, to carry out any or all of the responsibilities that this article requires of a VSMP authority, including plan review and inspection but not including enforcement.

If a locality establishes a VSMP, it shall issue a consolidated stormwater management and erosion and sediment control permit that is consistent with the provisions of the Erosion and Sediment Control Law (§

62.1-44.15:51

et seq.). When available in accordance with subsection J, such permit, where applicable, shall also include a copy of or reference to state VSMP permit coverage authorization to discharge.

Upon the development of an online reporting system by the Department, but no later than July 1, 2014, a VSMP authority shall then be required to obtain evidence of state VSMP permit coverage where it is required prior to providing approval to begin land disturbance.

Any VSMP adopted pursuant to and consistent with this article shall be considered to meet the stormwater management requirements under the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq.) and attendant regulations, and effective July 1, 2014, shall not be subject to local program review under the stormwater management provisions of the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act.

All VSMP authorities shall comply with the provisions of this article and the stormwater management provisions of the Erosion and Sediment Control Law (§

62.1-44.15:51

et seq.) and related regulations. The VSMP authority responsible for regulating the land-disturbing activity shall require compliance with the issued permit, permit conditions, and plan specifications. The state shall enforce state permits.

In the case of a land-disturbing activity located on property controlled by a regional industrial facility authority established pursuant to Chapter 64 (§

15.2-6400

et seq.) of Title 15.2, if a participating local member of such an authority also administers a VSMP, such locality shall be authorized to administer the VSMP on authority property, in accordance with an agreement entered into with all relevant localities and the existing VSMP for the property.

History.

1989, cc. 467, 499, § 10.1-603.3; 2004, c. 372; 2006, c. 171; 2009, c. 18; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2014, cc. 303, 598; 2016, cc. 68, 758; 2017, c. 349; 2018, c. 154; 2022, c. 160.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect at that time, see the following section, also numbered

62.1-44.15:27

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 5 provides: “That the transfer of the responsibility for administering the issuance and enforcement of national pollutant discharge elimination system permits for the control of stormwater discharges shall become effective on July 1, 2013, or upon the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s rescission of authorization for delegation of program authority to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, whichever occurs later.” Pursuant to a letter received from the Environmental Protection Agency on July 2, 2013, the transfer of responsibility from DCR to DEQ has been approved as required by this provision.

Acts
2014, cc. 303 and
598, cl. 2 provides: “That amendments to regulations of the State Water Control Board necessary to implement the provisions of this act shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act ( §

2.2-4000

et seq.), provided that there is a public comment period of at least 30 days on the proposed amendments prior to Board adoption.”

Acts
2014, cc. 303 and
598, cl. 3 provides: “That the consolidation into Virginia’s General Permit for Discharges of Stormwater from Construction Activities of state post-construction requirements exceeding minimum federal requirements shall not be construed to modify the scope of federal agency or citizen suit enforcement pursuant to the Clean Water Act ( 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.).”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 303, effective March 24, 2014, and c. 598, effective April 4, 2014, are identical, and rewrote subsection A; in subsection B inserted “including a town that operates a regulated MS4,” substituted “decide, but shall not be required to” for “adopt its own program or shall” and “county’s VSMP” for “county program” in the first sentence and added the second and third sentences; in subsections E and L substituted “the Erosion and Sediment Control Law” for “Article 2.4”; in subsection I substituted “If a locality establishes a VSMP, it” for “Localities”; in subsection L added the last sentence; and deleted subsection M, which read “VSMPs adopted in accordance with this section shall become effective July 1, 2014, unless otherwise specified by the Board.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 349 added the last sentence in subsection H.

The 2017 amendment by c. 349 added the last sentence in subsection I.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 154 added the last sentence to the second paragraph of subsection A.

The 2018 amendment by c. 154 added subsection E and redesignated former subsections E through K as F through L.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Stormwater fee. —

The stormwater fee set forth in a city code to recoup costs associated with the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System Permit program is a service fee rather than a tax, and the United States Navy is not constitutionally exempt from paying the fee. See opinion of Attorney General to Ronald S. Hallman, Esq., Chesapeake City Attorney, 09-098, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 8 (3/4/10).

Restrictions on use of fertilizer. —

Virginia locality is authorized by § 10.1-603.7 and §

15.2-924.1

to adopt an ordinance regulating or prohibiting the use or application of fertilizers within its jurisdictional boundaries provided the locality makes the factual findings required by subsection A of § 10.1-603.7 and determines that the ordinance is necessary to prevent any further degradation to water resources or to address specific existing water pollution. The locality also must comply with the public hearing procedures required by subsection A of § 10.1-603.7. See opinion of Attorney General to James E. Barnett, Esq., York County Attorney, 09-035, 2009 Va. AG LEXIS 55 (9/1/09).